Maryland, session 2025, HB0506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
SUBTITLE 24. MARYLAND LEADERS IN ENVIRONMENTALLY ENGAGED FARMING
(LEEF) PROGRAM.
2–2401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMUNITY BEST PRACTICE” MEANS A FARM’S OR FARMER’S
DEMONSTRATED ENGAGEMENT WITH MARYLAND COMMUNITIES AS IT RELATES TO:
(1) THE PRODUCTION, SALE, OR DISTRIBUTION OF MARYLAND FARM
PRODUCTS; OR
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
(2) PROVIDING SERVICE TO AN ORGANIZATION WHOSE FOCUS IS
ADVANCING MARYLAND’S AGRICULTURAL INDUSTRY, ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES,
CONSERVATION PRACTICES, OR AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND EDUCATION.
(C) “CONSERVATION PRACTICE” MEANS AN AGRICULTURAL PRACTICE
THAT:
(1) PREVENTS OR TREATS PROBLEMS WITH SOIL, WATER, AIR, PLANT,
OR ANIMAL SOURCES OF POLLUTION; AND
(2) HAS A STANDARD METHOD OF CONSTRUCTION OR APPLICATION
THAT IS DEVELOPED BY THE NATURAL RESOURCES CONSERVATION SERVICE AND
LISTED IN THE SERVICE’S MARYLAND FIELD OFFICE TECHNICAL GUIDE.
(D) (1) “FIXED NATURAL BUFFER” MEANS A STRIP OF MAINTAINED,
NATIVE VEGETATION ALONGSIDE A BODY OF WATER.
(2) “FIXED NATURAL BUFFER” INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING FIXED
NATURAL FILTER PRACTICES:
(I) THE PLANTING OF RIPARIAN FOREST BUFFERS;
(II) THE PLANTING OF RIPARIAN HERBACEOUS COVER;
(III) TREE PLANTINGS THAT ARE ON AGRICULTURAL LAND; AND
(IV) WETLAND RESTORATION.
(3) “FIXED NATURAL BUFFER” DOES NOT INCLUDE PASTURE
MANAGEMENT, AS DESCRIBED UNDER § 8–701(D)(5) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(E) “100–FOOT TIDAL BUFFER” MEANS ANY LAND WITHIN 100 FEET OF:
(1) THE MEAN HIGH WATER LINE OF TIDAL WATERS;
(2) THE EDGE OF EACH BANK OF A TRIBUTARY TIDAL STREAM; OR
(3) THE LANDWARD BOUNDARY OF A TIDAL WETLAND.
(F) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND LEADERS IN ENVIRONMENTALLY
ENGAGED FARMING (LEEF) PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–2402 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
2–2402.
– 3 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND LEADERS IN ENVIRONMENTALLY ENGAGED
FARMING (LEEF) PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSES OF THE PROGRAM ARE TO:
(1) INVIGORATE STRATEGIES TO:
(I) REDUCE NUTRIENTS IN SUPPORT OF CHESAPEAKE BAY
WATERSHED RESTORATION;
(II) MITIGATE FARM EMISSIONS AND INCREASE CARBON
SEQUESTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH MARYLAND’S CLIMATE POLLUTION
REDUCTION PLAN; AND
(III) ALIGN ENVIRONMENTAL GOALS AND INITIATIVES OF THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE WHILE ENHANCING FARM PROFITABILITY;
(2) PROVIDE PRODUCERS WITH GREATER INCENTIVES TO
VOLUNTARILY PARTICIPATE IN THE ADOPTION OF MULTIPLE CONSERVATION
PRACTICES AND COMMUNITY BEST PRACTICES WITHIN INDIVIDUAL AGRICULTURAL
OPERATIONS OR ACROSS MULTIPLE OPERATIONS THAT ARE IN CLOSE PROXIMITY TO
ONE ANOTHER;
(3) ESTABLISH TIERS OF RECOGNITION FOR PRODUCERS TO BE
EVALUATED FOR PROGRAM CERTIFICATION; AND
(4) PROVIDE STATE FUNDS TO INCENTIVIZE THE COORDINATED
ADOPTION OF CONSERVATION PRACTICES AND COMMUNITY BEST PRACTICES TO
ACHIEVE ENVIRONMENTAL, SOCIAL, AND CLIMATE RESILIENCY BENEFITS AND
NUTRIENT AND SEDIMENT REDUCTION.
2–2403.
TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE PROGRAM THE DEPARTMENT SHALL,
SUBJECT TO THE DISCRETION OF THE SECRETARY:
(1) ASSIGN A PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR AND PROVIDE FOR
ADEQUATE ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT;
(2) IN CONSULTATION WITH MEMBERS OF THE AGRICULTURAL,
CONSERVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITIES,
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
DEVELOP AND PROMOTE A SUITE OF CONSERVATION PRACTICES AND COMMUNITY
BEST PRACTICES ELIGIBLE FOR THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(I) CONSERVATION TILLAGE;
(II) NUTRIENT INPUT REDUCTION;
(III) COVER CROP PLANTINGS;
(IV) USE OF NATURAL FILTERS;
(V) CONSERVING AND INCREASING WILDLIFE AND POLLINATOR
HABITATS;
(VI) HEALTHY SOILS PRACTICES;
(VII) FACILITATING WORK EXPERIENCE FOCUSED ON
AGRICULTURE IN UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES;
(VIII) PARTNERING WITH OPERATORS TO IMPROVE
CONSERVATION PRACTICES ON LEASED LAND;
(IX) LIAISING BETWEEN THE DEPARTMENT AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES TO FACILITATE OUTREACH AND IDENTIFY BARRIERS TO
DEPARTMENT PROGRAMS REACHING BROADER AUDIENCES;
(IX) (X) PARTICIPATING IN THE FARMERS’ MARKET
NUTRITION PROGRAM;
(X) (XI) PARTNERING WITH FOOD BANKS OR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS TO ADDRESS FOOD INSECURITY;
(XI) (XII) PARTICIPATING IN THE CERTIFIED LOCAL FARM AND
FISH PROGRAM;
(XII) (XIII) USING ON–FARM RENEWABLE ENERGY;
(XIII) (XIV) MENTORING NEW AND BEGINNING FARMERS; AND
(XIV) (XV) PARTNERING WITH AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION OR QUALIFIED TECHNICAL SERVICE PROVIDER TO CONDUCT
FIELD–BASED RESEARCH; OR
– 5 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(XVI) INSTALLATION OF A FIXED NATURAL BUFFER, INCLUDING
WITHIN A 100–FOOT TIDAL BUFFER;
(3) IN CONSULTATION WITH MEMBERS OF THE AGRICULTURAL,
CONSERVATION, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMUNITIES,
DEVELOP CRITERIA AND APPROPRIATE EVALUATION MEASURES TO ESTABLISH THE
TIERS OF RECOGNITION FOR PROGRAM CERTIFICATION THAT INCLUDES
CONSIDERATION OF:
(I) PROXIMITY OF A CONSERVATION PRACTICE OR COMMUNITY
BEST PRACTICE TO WATERS OF THE STATE;
(II) THE EXTENT TO WHICH A CONSERVATION PRACTICE OR
COMMUNITY BEST PRACTICE PROTECTS OR RESTORES THE CHESAPEAKE AND
ATLANTIC COASTAL BAYS CRITICAL AREA OR OTHER AREA DESIGNATED FOR
REGULATION OR SPECIAL PROTECTION UNDER A FEDERAL OR STATE LAW; AND
(III) THE EXTENT TO WHICH A CONSERVATION PRACTICE OR
COMMUNITY BEST PRACTICE ENGAGES WITH AND BENEFITS OVERBURDENED AND
UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES;
(4) EVALUATE APPLICATIONS ON A CONTINUING BASIS AND
CONFIRM PARTICIPANT COMPLIANCE WITH PROGRAM CRITERIA; AND
(5) COORDINATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES,
THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT, AND THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION, AS APPROPRIATE, TO ESTABLISH INCENTIVES FOR
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM.
2–2404.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND LEADERS IN
ENVIRONMENTALLY ENGAGED FARMING (LEEF) PROGRAM FUND.
(B) THERE IS A MARYLAND LEADERS IN ENVIRONMENTALLY ENGAGED
FARMING (LEEF) PROGRAM FUND IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY, AND THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
(E) THE FUND, FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 THROUGH 2031, MAY RECEIVE UP
TO $2,000,000 PER YEAR OF THE MONEY THAT:
(1) IS APPROPRIATED IN THE ANNUAL STATE BUDGET TO FUND TREE
PLANTING UNDER § 8–706 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES WILL NOT BE ABLE TO BE USED
FOR THE TREE PLANTINGS.
(E) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
AT LEAST $900,000 TO THE FUND.
(F) (1) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO:
(1) (I) SUPPORT ACTIONS ASSOCIATED WITH FULFILLING THE
PROGRAM’S PURPOSE; AND
(2) (II) COVER NOT MORE THAN 20% OF SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, COVER THE DEPARTMENT’S ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS TO
ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(2) IN EACH FISCAL YEAR, NOT MORE THAN 20% OF THE FUND MAY BE
USED FOR ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT.
2–2405.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
8–706.
(a) To maximize participation in the Conservation Reserve Enhancement
Program, in fiscal years 2023 through 2031, inclusive, a landowner who enrolls land
planted with a forested streamside buffer shall receive a one–time signing bonus of up to
$1,000 per acre of land enrolled.
(b) Signing bonuses provided under this section shall be funded with:
(1) Money appropriated under subsection (c) of this section; and
(2) The amount specified in § 9–1605.2(i)(11)(i) of the Environment Article.
(c) (1) For fiscal years 2024 through 2031, in each year the Governor shall
appropriate $2,500,000 in the annual State budget to fund [tree]:
– 7 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) TREE planting under this section and other tree planting
programs on agricultural land; AND
(II) THE MARYLAND LEADERS IN ENVIRONMENTALLY
ENGAGED FARMING (LEEF) PROGRAM FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–2404 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(2) Money appropriated under this subsection is supplemental to and may
not take the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for tree plantings under
this section and other tree planting programs on agricultural land.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–1901.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (I) “Healthy soils” means the continuing capacity of soil to:
[(i)] 1. Function as a biological system;
[(ii)] 2. Increase soil organic matter;
[(iii)] 3. Improve soil structure and water and nutrient holding
capacity; and
[(iv)] 4. Sequester carbon and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(II) “HEALTHY SOILS” MAY INCLUDE REGENERATIVE
PRACTICES AND TRADITIONS.
(3) “Program” means the Maryland Healthy Soils Program.
(4) (I) “REGENERATIVE PRACTICES AND TRADITIONS” MEANS A
FORM OF LAND MANAGEMENT AND STEWARDSHIP APPROACHES AND PRACTICES
THAT:
1. DRAWS ON TRADITIONS AND INNOVATIONS FROM
AFRICAN, INDIGENOUS, AND ORIGINAL LAND STEWARDS;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
2. PROMOTES CULTURALLY IMPORTANT FOOD AND
CLIMATE JUSTICE PROGRAMS AND INITIATIVES; AND
3. ENHANCES THE LAND AND ECOSYSTEM THROUGH
ADAPTIVE LAND MANAGEMENT PRACTICES THAT IMPROVE SOIL HEALTH AND
WATER QUALITY, RESTORE BIODIVERSITY, MITIGATE CLIMATE CHANGE IMPACTS,
AND PROVIDE THE GREATEST COMMUNITY BENEFITS.
(II) “REGENERATIVE PRACTICES AND TRADITIONS” INCLUDES
PRACTICES SUCH AS PRODUCING FOOD IN THE STATE FOR DISTRIBUTION WITHIN
THE STATE.
Article – Health – General
21–305.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a person may not operate a food
establishment unless the person is licensed by the Department.
(b) (1) A separate license is required for each food establishment that a person
owns or operates.
(2) Except in Baltimore City, the provisions of this subsection may require
a license for each location where vending machines are operated, but may not require a
separate license for each individual vending machine.
(3) Except in Baltimore City, vending machine locations used exclusively
for prepackaged and commercially sealed foods that are not potentially hazardous, as
defined by regulation, are not required to be licensed.
(4) In Baltimore City, a license may be required for each individual vending
machine.
(5) (i) An excluded organization may operate a food establishment
without a license unless the excluded organization has been issued a license under §
21–304(a)(2)(ii) of this subtitle.
(ii) If the Department adopts regulations governing excluded
organizations serving potentially hazardous foods prepared in a private kitchen, an
excluded organization shall meet any requirements in the regulations.
(6) A license is not required for a person who:
(i) Produces shell eggs;
(ii) Sells the shell eggs directly to the public; and
– 9 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) Is registered with or inspected by the Secretary of Agriculture
under § 4–310 or § 4–311.1 of the Agriculture Article.
(7) A LICENSE IS NOT REQUIRED FOR A PERSON WHO:
(I) IS LICENSED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES UNDER § 4–701 OR § 4–701.1 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE;
AND
(II) HARVESTS AND PROCESSES FINFISH ON A VESSEL BY
IKEJIME FOR DIRECT SALE TO RESTAURANTS.
(8) Except as provided in § 21–304 of this subtitle, nothing in this subtitle
shall preempt the right of a county to require a permit under the authority provided by a
local law, ordinance, or regulation if this subtitle does not require the food establishment
to obtain a State license.
Article – Natural Resources
SUBTITLE 11. WATER QUALITY MONITORING PROGRAM.
3–1101.
(A) THERE IS A WATER QUALITY MONITORING PROGRAM WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE WATER QUALITY MONITORING PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) PROVIDE FOR A CONSISTENT STATEWIDE APPROACH FOR
IMPROVING WATER QUALITY MONITORING DATA, CONSISTENT WITH THE MOST
UP–TO–DATE SCIENTIFIC KNOWLEDGE AND TECHNOLOGIES;
(2) CONDUCT LONG–TERM AND TARGETED SHORT–TERM WATER
QUALITY MONITORING AND ASSESSMENTS TO DEVELOP AN UNDERSTANDING OF
AND GUIDE PROGRAMS DESIGNED TO MEET WATER QUALITY IMPROVEMENT GOALS,
IMPROVE AQUATIC LIVING RESOURCES AND HABITAT, ADDRESS CLIMATE CHANGE
IMPACTS, AND IMPLEMENT RESILIENCE PLANNING;
(3) INTEGRATE WATER QUALITY MONITORING DATA INTO PLANNING
PROCESSES TO INFORM POLICY CHOICES ABOUT THE EFFECTIVENESS OF
MANAGEMENT ACTIONS; AND
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
(4) PROVIDE THE GENERAL PUBLIC WITH READILY AVAILABLE
WATER QUALITY MONITORING DATA TO GUIDE RECREATIONAL AND OTHER PASSIVE
USES.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ASSESS AND INCORPORATE WATER QUALITY
MONITORING DATA THAT MEETS THE QUALITY ASSURANCE AND USE GOALS OF THE
STATE DATA SETS INTO THE WATER QUALITY MONITORING PROGRAM.
4–215.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Conservation and management measures” means 1 or more techniques
through which the objectives of a fishery management plan are achieved.
(3) “Fishery” or “fishery resource” means:
(i) One or more stocks of fish which can be treated as a unit for
purposes of conservation and management and which are identified on the basis of
geographic, scientific, technical, recreational, and economic characteristics; or
(ii) The group or industry harvesting those stocks.
(4) “Fishery management” means the system used to conserve and allocate
the fishery resource, including research and data collection, determination of objectives and
management measures, and establishment, enforcement, and periodic evaluation of
regulations.
(5) “Fishery management plan” means [a document or report that
contains] a systematic description of a given fishery OR FISHERIES and the objectives and
conservation and management measures for the fishery OR FISHERIES.
(6) “SUPPLEMENT” MEANS A MARYLAND–SPECIFIC SUPPLEMENT
PREPARED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) (1) [The Department shall prepare fishery management plans for the
following species:
(1) Striped bass or rockfish;
(2) (I) White perch;
(3) (II) Yellow perch;
(4) American shad;
– 11 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) Hickory shad;
(6) (III) Oysters;
(7) (IV) Blue crabs;
(8) Bluefish;
(9) Herring;
(10) Weakfish;
(11) Croaker;
(12) Spot;
(13) Summer flounder;
(14) American eel;
(15) Red drum;
(16) Black drum;
(17) Spotted sea trout;
(18) Horseshoe crabs;
(19) Menhaden;
(20) Tautog;
(21) Black sea bass;
(22) Scup;
(23) (V) Hard shell clams;
(24) (VI) Catfish; and
(25) (VII) Cownose ray].
(2) FOR SPECIES OF FISH THAT HAVE AN ATLANTIC STATES MARINE
FISHERIES COMMISSION FISHERY MANAGEMENT PLAN, AS AUTHORIZED UNDER §
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
4–301 OF THIS TITLE, OR A FEDERAL REGIONAL FISHERY MANAGEMENT COUNCIL
FISHERY MANAGEMENT PLAN, THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) (I) SHALL MANAGE THOSE SPECIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THOSE PLANS AND ANY SUPPLEMENTS TO THOSE PLANS;
(2) (II) MAY IMPLEMENT CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT
MEASURES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PLANS;
(3) (III) MAY PREPARE A MARYLAND–SPECIFIC SUPPLEMENT TO
THOSE PLANS IF, AFTER CONSULTATION WITH THE TIDAL FISHERIES ADVISORY
COMMISSION, SPORT FISHERIES ADVISORY COMMISSION, AND ANY OTHER
APPROPRIATE ADVISORY BODIES CREATED UNDER THIS TITLE, THE DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT IMPOSING MORE RESTRICTIVE MEASURES IS NECESSARY TO
CONSERVE THE FISHERY; AND
(4) (IV) MAY IMPLEMENT CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT
MEASURES IN ACCORDANCE WITH A SUPPLEMENT ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION; AND
(V) MAY MANAGE THOSE SPECIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH A
FISHERY MANAGEMENT PLAN PREPARED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) (1) The Department may prepare fishery management plans for any
species of fish if, after consultation with the [Tidal Fisheries Advisory Commission and, the
Sport Fisheries Advisory Commission, AND ANY OTHER] APPROPRIATE ADVISORY
BODIES CREATED UNDER THIS TITLE, the Department determines that the plans are
necessary based on:
(I) LACK OF MANAGEMENT BY THE ATLANTIC STATES MARINE
FISHERIES COMMISSION OR A FEDERAL REGIONAL FISHERY MANAGEMENT
COUNCIL;
[(1)] (II) The population of the species;
[(2)] (III) The distribution of the species;
[(3)] (IV) The habitat needs of the species; or
[(4)] (V) Other biological, ecological, CLIMATOLOGICAL, or
socioeconomic factors concerning the species OR CHESAPEAKE BAY REGION.
[(d) (1)] (2) A FISHERY MANAGEMENT PLAN MAY INCLUDE:
– 13 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) PROPOSED LIMITATIONS ON THE CATCH OF FISH, BASED ON
AREA, SPECIES, SIZE, NUMBER, WEIGHT, SEX, INCIDENTAL CATCH, TOTAL BIOMASS,
OR OTHER FACTORS THAT ARE NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE FOR CONSERVATION
AND MANAGEMENT OF A FISHERY;
(II) INCORPORATION OF RELEVANT FISHERY CONSERVATION
AND MANAGEMENT MEASURES PROPOSED OR ADOPTED BY INTERSTATE BODIES OF
WHICH MARYLAND IS A MEMBER; AND
(III) OTHER PROPOSED MEASURES, REQUIREMENTS, OR
CONDITIONS AND RESTRICTIONS THAT ARE NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE FOR
FISHERY MANAGEMENT.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY IMPLEMENT CONSERVATION AND
MANAGEMENT MEASURES IN ACCORDANCE WITH A FISHERY MANAGEMENT PLAN
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) Conservation and management measures [adopted]
IMPLEMENTED under a fishery management plan, to the extent possible:
[(i)] 1. Shall prevent overfishing while attempting to achieve the
best and most efficient utilization of the State’s fishery resources;
[(ii)] 2. Shall be based on the best information available;
[(iii)] 3. May not discriminate unfairly among groups of
[fishermen] ANGLERS COMMERCIAL AND RECREATIONAL FISHING PARTICIPANTS,
INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS LICENSED TO GUIDE FISHING PARTIES AND CHARTER
BOAT CAPTAINS, or have economic allocation as its sole purpose;
[(iv)] 4. Shall take into account and allow for variations among,
and contingencies in, fisheries, fishery resources, and catches; [and]
[(v)] 5. Shall avoid duplication of regulatory efforts and
unnecessary costs to the State and to any other person; AND
6. SHALL TAKE INTO ACCOUNT CHANGES IN
ENVIRONMENTAL FACTORS, INCLUDING CLIMATOLOGICAL FACTORS.
[(2)] (4) If it becomes necessary to allocate or assign fishing privileges
among various groups of individuals under paragraph [(1)(iii)] (3)(II)3 of this subsection,
or under any fishery management plan, that allocation shall be:
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
(i) Fair and equitable to all individuals;
(ii) Reasonably calculated to promote conservation; and
(iii) Carried out in such a manner that no particular individual,
corporation, or other entity acquires an excessive share of such privileges.
[(e) (1)] (5) [Except] SUBJECT TO ANY APPLICABLE SUPPLEMENT AND
EXCEPT as provided in paragraph [(2)] (6) of this subsection, a fishery management plan
may apply separately or jointly to the waters of the Chesapeake Bay and its tidal
tributaries, the coastal bays and their tributaries, and the Maryland waters of the Atlantic
Ocean and shall include:
(i) The best available estimates of sustainable harvest rates;
(ii) Indicators that would trigger any tightening or loosening of
harvest restrictions;
(iii) A description of the fishery, including:
1. The history of the fishery, and its current condition
relative to historic populations;
2. The numbers of potential commercial FISHING
PARTICIPANTS, INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS LICENSED TO GUIDE FISHING PARTIES
AND CHARTER BOAT CAPTAINS, and recreational [fishermen] ANGLERS FISHING
PARTICIPANTS projected to participate in the fishery;
3. The type and quantity of fishing gear used commercially;
4. Where practicable, the cost likely to be incurred in the
management of the fishery; and
5. The actual and potential revenues from the recreational
and commercial fishery;
(iv) If the Department determines that a fishery has been, or is
currently, overfished:
1. A species–specific time period for:
A. Ending or appropriately addressing overfishing; and
B. Rebuilding the stock of the species to a sustainable level;
and
– 15 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. A description of:
A. Management strategies that have a high probability of
reducing fishing to a target level within a target time period, as determined by the
Department; and
B. The appropriate assignment or allocation of fishing
privileges in accordance with [subsection (d)(2)] PARAGRAPH (4) of this [section]
SUBSECTION; and
(v) Other pertinent data that will assist the Secretary in
determining conservation and management measures reasonably necessary to ensure that
the fishery resources will be sustained.
[(2)] (6) The Department may waive the requirements in paragraph
[(1)(iv)] (5)(IV) of this subsection for a species of fish if the Department determines that
meeting the requirements is not practicable or biologically appropriate based on:
(i) The specific biology of the species;
(ii) The management of the species under a federal or multi–state
fishery management plan;
(iii) The designation of the species as a nuisance;
(iv) Environmental conditions; or
(v) Other ecological factors.
[(3)] (D) (1) (i) The Department shall:
1. In coordination with the University of Maryland Center
for Environmental Science and the Oyster Advisory Commission, develop a package of
consensus recommendations for enhancing and implementing the fishery management
plan for oysters that will be informed by a collaboratively developed, science–based
modeling tool to quantify the long–term impacts of identified management actions and
possible combinations of management actions on:
A. Oyster abundance;
B. Oyster habitat;
C. Oyster harvest;
D. Oyster harvest revenue; and
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
E. Nitrogen removal; and
2. Hold public listening sessions throughout the State to
identify possible management actions for use in the public oyster fishery.
(ii) The Oyster Advisory Commission, with the assistance of external
conflict resolution and facilitation specialists, shall:
1. Develop a package of consensus recommendations through
a facilitated consensus solutions process, based on a 75% majority agreement level for each
recommendation;
2. Recommend management actions or combinations of
management actions to achieve the targets identified in the oyster stock assessment with
the goal of increasing oyster abundance; and
3. Review model results for each management action or
combination of management actions to inform its recommendations.
(iii) 1. The Department shall submit interim reports on the
development of the package of consensus recommendations by August 1, 2020, December
1, 2020, and August 1, 2021, to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
2. In addition to the requirements under subsubparagraph 1
of this subparagraph, the Department shall include in the interim report submitted by
August 1, 2021:
A. The status of the development of the science–based
modeling tool used to quantify the long–term impacts of identified management actions;
and
B. A summary of the model results of any actions identified
by the Oyster Advisory Commission on or before the date of the interim report.
3. The Department shall provide a final report by December
1, 2021, which will include an implementation schedule for the consensus
recommendations, to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
(iv) To be responsive to changes in the oyster resource due to
environmental conditions, the Department shall:
1. Review the status of the stock relative to reference points
every 2 years and conduct a benchmark stock assessment every 6 years with consideration
of new methods and with external peer review; and
– 17 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. With the input of interested stakeholders, implement
management actions that increase oyster habitat, maintain harvest, and grow the oyster
stock.
[(4)] (2) The fishery management plan developed in accordance with
paragraph [(3)] (1) of this subsection shall:
(i) End the overfishing of oysters in all areas and regions of the
Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries where overfishing has occurred according to biological
reference points established by the most recent oyster stock assessment while maintaining
a harvest in the fishery;
(ii) Achieve fishing mortality rates at target levels;
(iii) Increase oyster abundance;
(iv) Increase oyster habitat; and
(v) Facilitate the long–term sustainable harvest of oysters,
including the public fishery.
[(f) A fishery management plan may include:
(1) Proposed limitations on the catch of fish, based on area, species, size,
number, weight, sex, incidental catch, total biomass, or other factors, which are necessary
and appropriate for conservation and management of a fishery;
(2) Incorporation of relevant fishery conservation and management
measures proposed or adopted by interstate bodies of which Maryland is a member; and
(3) Other proposed measures, requirements, or conditions and restrictions
which are necessary and appropriate for fishery management.
(g)] (E) The Department shall present the management plans AND
SUPPLEMENTS under this section in the form of an annual report, subject to § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, to:
(1) The Legislative Policy Committee;
(2) The Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment;
and
(3) The Environment and Transportation Committee.
[(h)] (F) (1) (i) The [Secretary shall] DEPARTMENT:
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
1. SHALL adopt [the proposed] BY REGULATION:
A. A FISHERY management [plans] PLAN PREPARED BY
THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
B. A SUPPLEMENT PREPARED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER THIS SECTION; and [any proposed]
2. MAY ADOPT conservation and management measures by
regulation FOR:
A. AN ATLANTIC STATES MARINE FISHERIES
COMMISSION FISHERY MANAGEMENT PLAN;
B. A FEDERAL REGIONAL FISHERY MANAGEMENT
COUNCIL FISHERY MANAGEMENT PLAN;
C. A FISHERY MANAGEMENT PLAN PREPARED AND
ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
D. A SUPPLEMENT PREPARED AND ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(ii) 1. The Secretary may adopt conservation and management
measures in separate proceedings and by separate regulations.
2. Conservation and management measures adopted
separately may include changes to those proposed or adopted in a fishery management plan
OR SUPPLEMENT and any additional measures necessary to carry out the adopted plan
OR SUPPLEMENT.
(iii) The Secretary may not prohibit the use of pound net sites in the
coastal bays that are registered with the Department as of January 1, 2000.
(2) (I) The regulations of the Department to implement a fisheries
management plan for the coastal bays may not become effective under this section until the
Department first holds A public [hearings in Worcester County] HEARING.
(II) THE PUBLIC HEARING REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY BE HELD IN PERSON IN WORCESTER COUNTY OR, IN
WHOLE OR IN PART, REMOTELY BY ELECTRONIC MEANS.
– 19 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) All notices of public hearings required for the adoption of regulations
under this section shall be printed in the Maryland Register and further publicized so as to
provide reasonable notice to the affected communities OF COMMERCIAL FISHING
PARTICIPANTS, INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS LICENSED TO GUIDE FISHING PARTIES
AND CHARTER BOAT CAPTAINS, AND RECREATIONAL FISHING PARTICIPANTS [of
fishermen] and the public.
[(i)] (G) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, except § 4–1002 of
this title, once a fishery management plan OR SUPPLEMENT has been adopted by
regulation, the State’s fishery resources shall be harvested in accordance with the
conservation and management measures in the fishery management plan OR
SUPPLEMENT and any regulations implementing or amending that plan OR
SUPPLEMENT.
[(j)] (H) The provisions of this section do not apply to aquaculture activities in
nontidal ponds, lakes, or impoundments in the State.
4–11A–09.
(g) (1) If an application for a submerged land or water column lease in the
Chesapeake Bay or in the Atlantic Coastal Bays meets the requirements of this subtitle:
(i) The applicant for the lease shall mark the CENTER OF THE
proposed area with a stake; and
(ii) The Department shall:
1. SURVEY THE CORNERS OF THE PROPOSED LEASE
AREA;
2. Advertise the application on the website of the
Department and once a week for 2 weeks in a newspaper published in the county or counties
where the proposed lease is to be located;
[2.] 3. Notify the owners of property directly in front of the
proposed activity;
[3.] 4. Notify each Chair of an Oyster Committee in the county in
which the proposed activity is located; and
[4.] 5. Notify other interested parties that the Department
[deems] CONSIDERS appropriate.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
(2) (i) [Within] ANY PERSON MAY SUBMIT A WRITTEN REQUEST
FOR A PUBLIC INFORMATIONAL MEETING ON THE ISSUANCE OF A LEASE WITHIN 30
days [of] AFTER publication of the last advertisement under paragraph (1) of this
subsection[, any].
(II) THE REQUEST FOR A PUBLIC INFORMATIONAL MEETING
SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
MUST CONTAIN THE NAME, MAILING ADDRESS, AND E–MAIL ADDRESS OF THE
REQUESTOR.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HOLD A PUBLIC INFORMATIONAL
MEETING ON THE ISSUANCE OF A LEASE ON THE REQUEST OF ANY PERSON.
(3) (I) ANY person who has a specific right, duty, privilege, or interest
that is different from that held by the general public and may be adversely affected by the
proposed lease may file a WRITTEN petition with the Department protesting the issuance
of the lease:
1. WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER PUBLICATION OF THE LAST
ADVERTISEMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; OR
2. WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER A PUBLIC INFORMATIONAL
MEETING HELD IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) A PROTEST FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MUST CONTAIN:
1. THE NAME, MAILING ADDRESS, AND E–MAIL ADDRESS
OF THE PROTESTANT;
2. A STATEMENT INDICATING THAT THE PROTESTANT
INTENDS TO PROTEST THE LEASE AND THE REASONS FOR THE PROTEST; AND
3. A STATEMENT DESCRIBING THE PROTESTANT’S
SPECIFIC RIGHT, DUTY, PRIVILEGE, OR INTEREST THAT IS DIFFERENT FROM THAT
HELD BY THE GENERAL PUBLIC AND MAY BE ADVERSELY AFFECTED BY THE
PROPOSED LEASE.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE MEDIATION BETWEEN
THE PROTESTANT, THE APPLICANT, AND THE DEPARTMENT BEFORE TRANSMITTING
THE PROTEST TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
– 21 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii)] (IV) The protest shall be heard in accordance with the
requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act under Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State
Government Article.
[(iii) The Department shall hold a public informational meeting on the
issuance of a lease on the request of any person.
(iv)] (V) Immediately after termination of the period [prescribed]
SPECIFIED in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for filing a petition or after a final
decision dismissing a protest, the Department shall [survey the proposed leased area and]
issue a lease to the applicant.
(H) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE AQUACULTURE
COORDINATING COUNCIL, MAY CHARGE AN APPLICANT REASONABLE ADVERTISING
AND SURVEY FEES.
4–11A–14.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a leaseholder
may cultivate or remove shellfish planted on [his] THE LEASEHOLDER’S aquaculture or
submerged land lease area in any manner [he deems] THE LEASEHOLDER CONSIDERS
proper.
(2) A person may not use a hydraulic escalator dredge to harvest shellfish
in the Atlantic Coastal Bays.
(b) (1) Each leaseholder shall keep accurate records concerning the seeding
and planting of cultch and [oysters] SHELLFISH on[,] and the harvesting[,] and selling of
[oysters] SHELLFISH from [his] THE LEASEHOLDER’S aquaculture, submerged land, or
demonstration lease area.
(2) Each leaseholder shall report this information to the Department
ELECTRONICALLY OR on forms SPECIFIED BY the Department [prescribes].
(c) (1) On or before January [1] 31 of each year, a leaseholder shall provide to
the Department a report documenting the use of the lease during the prior year.
(2) A leaseholder shall provide to the Department any other report that the
Department may require.
(3) Failure to file a report may result in termination of the lease.
(4) Failure to actively use a lease may result in termination of the lease.
SUBTITLE 21. AGRICULTURE LEASES ON DEPARTMENT LAND.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
5–2101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “HEALTHY SOILS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–1901 OF THE
AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(C) “REGENERATIVE PRACTICES AND TRADITIONS” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 2–1901 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
5–2102.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY LEASE LAND OWNED OR MANAGED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO A PERSON IMPLEMENTING PRACTICES THAT SUPPORT HEALTHY
SOILS AND REGENERATIVE PRACTICES AND TRADITIONS.
(B) (1) THE LEASE TERM MAY BE FOR A MINIMUM OF 10 YEARS.
(2) THE LEASE SHALL REQUIRE THE LESSEE TO COMPLY WITH ALL
APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS AND REGULATIONS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE ON THE DEVELOPMENT OF A TEMPLATE FOR LEASES ENTERED INTO
UNDER THIS SECTION.
8–2B–02.
(a) There is a Whole Watershed Restoration Partnership.
(b) The purpose of the Partnership is to accelerate restoration of the Chesapeake
and Atlantic Coastal Bays and their watersheds by equitably focusing assistance on actions
and areas that are:
(1) Cost–effective;
(2) Likely to demonstrate a rapid systemic response to restoration activity,
including rapid de–listing of impaired streams identified under § 303(d) of the federal Clean
Water Act; and
(3) Supported by the local government.
(c) (1) The Secretary shall establish a State management team to administer
the Partnership.
– 23 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The State management team shall include:
(i) One representative of the Department, designated by the
Secretary;
(ii) One representative of the Department of the Environment,
designated by the Secretary of the Environment;
(iii) One representative of the Department of Agriculture, designated
by the Secretary of Agriculture;
(iv) One representative of the Department of Planning, designated
by the Secretary of Planning;
(v) One representative of the Critical Area Commission for the
Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays, designated by the chair of the Commission; and
(vi) The Chief Resilience Officer, or the Chief Resilience Officer’s
designee.
(3) The representative of the Department shall chair the State
management team.
(4) The State management team shall coordinate with other entities,
including the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers and the U.S. Environmental Protection
Agency, as necessary to carry out its functions and duties under this subtitle.
(d) (1) The Partnership shall employ staff in accordance with the State budget.
(2) State agencies may provide staff or other assistance to the Partnership.
(e) On or before October 1, 2024, and every 5 years thereafter, the State
management team shall issue a request for proposals for projects that:
(1) Occur within a single Maryland 8–Digit Watershed as identified in the
statewide digital watershed file maintained by the Department of Information Technology;
(2) Include a strategy describing the partners, actions, and benefits that
the project will incorporate over a 5–year period;
(3) Provide at least five of the benefits specified under subsection (f)(2)(viii)
of this section; and
(4) Are endorsed by each county and municipal corporation in which the
project will occur.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, on or before March 1, 2025,
and every 5 years thereafter, the State management team may approve up to five projects
to receive assistance under this section.
(2) The State management team shall evaluate a proposed project based
on whether the proposed project:
(i) Is located in a watershed in which habitat restoration and
pollution reduction will:
1. Result in the greatest improvements to shallow water
habitat and living resources;
2. Achieve rapid de–listing of impaired streams identified
under § 303(d) of the federal Clean Water Act and published in the Department of the
Environment’s Triennial Review of Water Quality Standards; or
3. Generate rapidly improving conditions in the local
ecosystem;
(ii) Emphasizes actions that are expected to provide the greatest,
most cost–effective, and measurable amount of pollution reduction;
(iii) Supports land use policies, conservation programs, and
restoration protocols at the local level that will sustain project actions and outcomes;
(iv) Has documented interest from a group of affected property
owners to allow restoration or conservation actions on their property;
(v) Minimizes the loss of trees and other natural habitats;
(vi) Demonstrates opportunities to implement actions that reduce
environmental disparities experienced by overburdened or underserved communities;
(vii) Demonstrates opportunities to foster innovation in restoration
science or practices;
(viii) In addition to land–based habitat restoration and water quality
improvement, anticipates benefits related to:
1. The creation or restoration of wildlife habitat, riparian
buffers, and wetland restoration;
2. The restoration of aquatic resources, such as freshwater
mussels, fish passage, or oyster reefs;
– 25 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. Carbon sequestration;
4. Climate change mitigation, adaptation, or resilience;
5. Local employment opportunities;
6. Improving and protecting public health; and
7. Recreational opportunities and public access to waterways
and natural habitats; and
(ix) Creates partnership opportunities among nonprofit and
for–profit organizations, community organizations, all levels of government, and scientists.
(3) The State management team shall:
(i) Work to ensure that the projects approved include:
1. One project located in a predominantly urban area;
2. One project located in a predominantly suburban area;
3. Two projects primarily focused on reducing pollution in a
predominantly agricultural area; and
4. One project that incorporates collaborative efforts with an
adjoining state; and
(ii) Ensure that at least two approved projects are located in and
provide benefits to an overburdened or underserved community.
(4) The State management team may require siting, design, construction,
maintenance, and operation principles and standards for a project that are in addition to
those required by law or regulation if the team determines that those principles and
standards are necessary to preserve the benefits of the project.
(G) (1) AS SOON AS POSSIBLE AFTER APPROVING A PROJECT UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE STATE MANAGEMENT TEAM AND THE PROJECT SPONSOR SHALL MEET
TO DEVELOP A PLAN FOR PERMITTING THE PROJECT, INCLUDING IDENTIFYING ALL:
(I) REQUIRED STATE AND FEDERAL PERMITS;
(II) SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION THAT MUST BE SUBMITTED
WITH EACH PERMIT APPLICATION;
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
(III) TIME FRAMES FOR SUBMITTING THE PERMITS AND
SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION; AND
(IV) POINTS OF CONTACT WITHIN EACH RELEVANT AGENCY FOR
EACH OF THE PERMITS.
(2) TO EXPEDITE THE PERMITTING PROCESS TO THE EXTENT
ALLOWED BY STATE AND FEDERAL LAW, THE STATE MANAGEMENT TEAM AND
PROJECT SPONSOR SHALL:
(I) INVITE ALL RELEVANT STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES,
INCLUDING THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY, THE U.S. ARMY
CORPS OF ENGINEERS, AND THE NATIONAL MARINE FISHERIES SERVICE, TO THE
MEETING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) COORDINATE WITH EACH AGENCY TO DEVELOP THE PLAN
FOR PERMITTING THE PROJECT, INCLUDING TIME FRAMES AND REQUIREMENTS
FOR EACH APPLICATION.
[(g)] (H) For a period of 5 years after approving a project, the State management
team shall:
(1) Assist the project sponsor in developing an implementation and
financing plan, including measurable outcomes, for the duration of the project;
(2) Award implementation grants from the Fund and other appropriate
State funds and accounts:
(i) For up to 50% of project costs;
(ii) In accordance with the implementation and financing plan
developed under item (1) of this subsection; and
(iii) With consideration given to the progress of the project as
documented in the report required under subsection [(i)(2)] (J)(2) of this section;
(3) Award operations grants to the project sponsor for project
administration costs in accordance with § 8–2A–02(f)(5) of this title;
(4) Provide for coordinated and transparent State permitting to the extent
allowed by State and federal law, including the use of the permit tracking dashboard
established by the Secretary under subsection [(k)] (L) of this section;
(5) Provide funding to the project sponsor to support water quality
monitoring at the project site; and
– 27 –

Ch. 430 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) Meet with the project sponsor and participating local governments at
least six times each calendar year to review and facilitate progress on the project.
[(h)] (I) A project sponsor shall provide opportunities for community
engagement for the duration of the project by including:
(1) At least four community meetings that include representation from
each local government endorsing the project; and
(2) An opportunity for public comment on the preliminary design of each
major or large–scale action proposed by the project.
[(i)] (J) (1) A project sponsor shall identify appropriate metrics to track
progress on meeting the outcomes identified in the project’s implementation and financing
plan.
(2) (i) A project sponsor shall report on the progress of the project at
the intervals and in the format required by the State management team.
(ii) A report under this paragraph shall include information on:
1. Community engagement efforts;
2. Restoration and conservation actions initiated and
completed;
3. Trees affected and trees at immediate or future risk of
impact due to restoration actions;
4. Funding from all sources that was solicited, awarded, or
spent; and
5. The progress made toward meeting the outcomes
identified in the project’s implementation and financing plan, including the metrics used
for tracking progress under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) The State management team may require a project sponsor to perform
and report on water quality monitoring for more than 5 years.
[(j)] (K) On or before November 1, 2025, and each November 1 thereafter, the
State management team shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, on the status of each approved project.
[(k)] (L) (1) The Secretary shall establish a permit tracking dashboard that
provides [publicly]:
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 430
(I) PUBLICLY available information on the permit schedules and
requirements for actions that require a State OR FEDERAL permit; AND
(II) THE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS
SECTION REDACTED TO PROTECT ANY CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION.
(2) A PROJECT SPONSOR SHALL PROVIDE QUARTERLY UPDATES TO
THE STATE MANAGEMENT TEAM WITH THE INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR THE
PERMIT TRACKING DASHBOARD, INCLUDING THE STATUS OF ALL REQUIRED STATE
AND FEDERAL PERMITS.
(3) The permit tracking dashboard shall be made available to the public on
the Department’s website.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, by December 31, 2025, the
Department of the Environment shall:
(1) authorize oyster restoration projects funded in whole or in part by
federal, State, or local governments to be eligible to generate water quality trading credits;
and
(2) develop a process for certifying water quality trading credits generated
by oyster restoration projects.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of Chapters 558 and
559 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024 may not be construed to apply to permit or
license applications submitted to the Department of the Environment before July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. Section 1 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2030, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 29 –